sl-SI: Igra z žogo in pokalom, vključuje figure: Vponka/sponka; Navodila/vodnik za trike; Nadomestne kroglice; Nadomestne vrvice; Torba/kovček za shranjevanje; Drugo
th: สิ่งที่มีในเกมลูกบอลและถ้วย: คาราบิเนอร์/คลิป; คู่มือการเล่น/ทริค; ลูกบอลสำรอง; เชือกสำรอง; กระเป๋า/เคสสำหรับจัดเก็บ; อื่นๆ
ja: ボール＆カップゲームに含まれるパーツ: カラビナ/クリップ; インストラクション/トリックガイド; 交換用ボール; 交換用ストリング; 収納バッグ/ケース; その他
fi: Mukana tulevat pallo- ja kuppipelin osat: Karbiinihaka/klipsi; Ohje-/temppuopas; Vaihtopallo(t); Vaihtonaru(t); Säilytyskassi/-kotelo; Muu
pt-BR: Peças incluídos no jogo de bilboquê: Mosquetão/clipe; Guia de instruções/manobras; Bola(s) de reposição; Corda(s) de reposição; Bolsa/estojo de armazenamento; Outro
el: Κομμάτια παιχνιδιού με μπάλα και κύπελλο που περιλαμβάνονται: Καραμπίνερ/κλιπ; Οδηγός οδηγιών/κόλπων; Ανταλλακτική μπάλα (ή μπάλες); Ανταλλακτικό κορδόνι (ή κορδόνια); Τσάντα/θήκη αποθήκευσης; Άλλο
en: Ball & cup game included pieces: Carabiner/clip; Instruction/trick guide; Replacement ball(s); Replacement string(s); Storage bag/case; Other
sv: Delar till kulfångarpel som ingår: Karbinhake/klämma; Instruktion/trickguide; Reservbollar; Reservsnören; Förvaringsväska/fodral; Övrigt
lt-LT: Bilbokės žaidimo komplekte esančios detalės: Karabinas / segtukas; Instrukcija / triukų vadovas; Atsarginis (-iai) kamuoliukas (-ai); Atsarginė (-ės) virvelė (-ės); Laikymo krepšys / dėklas; Kita
hu: A labda- és pohárjáték darabjai mellékelve vannak: Karabiner/csipesz; Útmutató/trükkleírás; Pótlabda/pótlabdák; Pótzsinór(ok); Tárolótáska/tok; Egyéb
fr: Contenu du jeu de bilboquet: Mousqueton/clip; Guide d’instructions/figures; Balle(s) de rechange; Corde(s) de rechange; Sac/étui de rangement; Autre
tr: Top ve bardak oyunu ürün paketinde hangi parçaların bulunduğunu belirtir.: Karabina/klips; Talimat/hareket rehberi; Yedek top(lar); Yedek ip(ler); Saklama çantası/kılıfı; Diğer
da: Medfølgende dele i bold- og kop-spillet: Karabinhage/klips; Vejledning til instruktioner/tricks; Ekstra bold(e); Ekstra snor(e); Opbevaringstaske/etui; Andet
ru: Детали игры с мячом и стаканчиком в комплекте: Карабин/зажим; Инструкция/руководство по трюкам; Запасные мячи; Запасные шнурки; Сумка/чехол для хранения; Другое
zh-TW: 托球玩具包含件數: 登山扣/扣環; 說明書/技巧指南; 替換球; 替換線; 收納袋/盒; 其他
es: Juego de pelota y copa incluido: Mosquetón/clip; Guía de instrucciones/trucos; Bola(s) de repuesto; Cuerda(s) de repuesto; Bolsa/estuche de almacenamiento; Otro
nl: Ball en cup spel meegeleverde onderdelen: Karabijnhaak/clip; Instructie-/trucjesgids; Reservebal(len); Reservetouw(en); Opbergtas/-koffer; Overig
vi: Các bộ phận đi kèm trò chơi bóng và cốc: Móc carabiner/kẹp; Hướng dẫn/Mẹo biểu diễn; Bóng thay thế; Dây thay thế; Túi/hộp bảo quản; Khác
pl: Elementy gry ball & cup w zestawie: Karabińczyk/klips; Instrukcja/przewodnik po trikach; Zapasowa piłka (piłki); Zapasowy sznurek (sznurki); Torba/etui do przechowywania; Inne
de: Ball- und Becherspiel, inklusive Spielmaterialien: Karabiner/Clip; Anleitungs-/Trickbuch; Ersatzball/-bälle; Ersatzschnur/-schnüre; Aufbewahrungstasche/-etui; Sonstige
nb: Ball- og koppspill inkluderte deler: Karabinkrok/klemme; Instruksjons-/trikseguide; Ekstra ball(er); Ekstra snor(er); Oppbevaringspose/-etui; Annet
sk-SK: Loptové a pohárové hry v cene: Karabína/spona; Návod/sprievodca trikmi; Náhradná guľôčka(y); Náhradná šnúrka(y); Úložné vrecko/puzdro; Iné
pt-PT: Jogo de bola e copo com peças incluídas: Mosquetão/clipe; Guia de instruções/truques; Bola(s) de substituição; Fio(s) de substituição; Saco/estojo de armazenamento; Outro
hr-HR: Uključeni dijelovi u igri s čašama i lopticom: Karabiner / kopča; Upute / vodič za trikove; Zamjenske loptice; Zamjenski konopci; Torba / futrola za pohranu; Ostalo
ko: 포함된 공 및 컵 게임 구성품: 카라비너/클립; 설명서/트릭 가이드; 교체용 공; 교체용 줄; 보관용 가방/케이스; 기타
bg-BG: Включени части от играта топка и чашка: Карабинер/щипка; Инструкции/ръководство за трикове; Резервна топка/топки; Резервна връв/връви; Чанта/калъф за съхранение; Друго
ro-RO: Piese incluse pentru jocuri cu mingi și pahare: Carabinieră/clemă; Ghid de instrucțiuni/trucuri; Minge (mingi) de rezervă; Sfoară (sfori) de rezervă; Geantă/Husă de depozitare; Altele
it: Gioco con palla e tazza, pezzi inclusi: Moschettone/clip; Manuale di istruzioni/guida ai trick; Palla/e di ricambio; Cordoncino/i di ricambio; Borsa/custodia; Altro
zh-CN: 包括球类/杯子游戏部件: 登山扣/夹子; 说明书/技巧指南; 替换球; 替换绳; 收纳袋/盒; 其他
cs: Obsažené díly hry s míčkem v pohárku: Karabina/klip; Návod / průvodce triky; Náhradní míček/míčky; Náhradní šňůrka/šňůrky; Úložná taška / pouzdro; Jiné